District of Columbia statutes.
11-946

Rules of court.

The Superior Court shall conduct its business according to the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure and the Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure (except as otherwise provided in Title 23) unless it prescribes or adopts rules which modify those Rules. Rules which modify the Federal Rules shall be submitted for the approval of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, and they shall not take effect until approved by that court. The Superior Court may adopt and enforce other rules as it may deem necessary without the approval of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals if such rules do not modify the Federal Rules. The Superior Court may appoint a committee of lawyers to advise it in the performance of its duties under this section.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 487, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Cross References

Admission to bar, rules, see § 11-2501.
Attachment and garnishment of wages, rules of procedure concerning, see § 16-581.
Criminal Division rules and regulations, see § 16-701.
District of Columbia Court of Appeals, rules, see § 11-743.
Process, see § 11-943.
Professional bondsmen, rules concerning, see § 23-1108.
Subpoenas, see § 11-942.
Superior Court rules, applicability to Small Claims and Conciliation Branch, see § 16-3901.
Tax Division rules and regulations, see § 11-1203.
Public assistance, action for support, responsible relatives, see § 4-213.01.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-701.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-946.
1973 Ed., § 11-946.